Utah statutes.
52-1-10.   Duties imposed by subsequent laws covered by bond -- Informalities in bond not to affect validity.

The bonds of all civil officers shall cover duties required by laws passed subsequent to giving them. No bond shall be void for failure to comply with the law as to matters of form, but it shall be valid as to all matters contained therein, if it complies substantially with the law.

